New Jersey, session 222, A3702.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An owner or landlord is guilty of a fourth degree crime if the owner or landlord knowingly rents a dwelling to a tenant that is an illegal occupancy which causes serious bodily injury to or the death of another person. b.    A conviction under this section does not preclude the application of any criminal, civil, or administrative remedy or penalty under any other provision of law. For purposes of this act: illegal occupancy shall mean an occupancy in residential premises that fails to comply with local or State housing regulations or codes, local zoning ordinances, or has violations affecting the health and safety of the tenants. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.